Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1214
Licensed water well drilling supervisor, defined.

Licensed water well drilling supervisor means any individual who has obtained a license from the department and who is engaged in the construction or decommissioning of water wells. Such supervisor may have discretionary and supervisory authority over other employees of a water well contractor.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 14;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1153.